Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.13.200

Authentication, recording and publication of ordinances.

Ordinances of code cities organized under this chapter shall be authenticated, recorded and published as provided in RCW 35A.12.150 and 35A.12.160.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.13.200.]